Utah statutes.
78B-13-313.   Recognition and enforcement.
A court of this state shall accord full faith and credit to an order made
consistently with this chapter which enforces a child custody determination by
a court of another state unless the order has been vacated, stayed, or
modified by a court authorized to do so under Part 2, Jurisdiction.
